Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.070

Fees.

(1) The director is authorized to charge a fee for the estimated direct and indirect costs of the following:

(a) An application for a license and the investigation thereof;

(b) An application for approval to acquire control of a licensee and the investigation thereof;

(c) An application for approval for a licensee to merge with another corporation, an application for approval for a licensee to purchase all or substantially all of the business of another person, or an application for approval for a licensee to sell all or substantially all of its business or of the business of any of its offices to another licensee and the investigation thereof;

(d) An annual license;

(e) An examination by the director of a licensee or a subsidiary of a licensee. Excess examiner time shall be billed at a reasonable rate established by rule.

(2) A fee for filing an application with the director shall be paid at the time the application is filed with the director.

(3) All such fees shall be deposited in the financial services regulation fund and administered consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.320.110.

[ 2001 c 177 s 9; 1994 c 92 s 266; 1989 c 212 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 177: See note following RCW 43.320.080.

Construction—1989 c 212 s 7: "Nothing in section 7 of this act shall be construed to prevent repayment to the general fund of the twenty-five thousand dollar start-up appropriation set forth in section 15 of this act." [ 1989 c 212 s 14.]